Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5521.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 109z. (1) The department shall not provide coverage for a human organ transplant under the medical assistance program if either of the following applies: (a) The transplant operation is performed in China or another country known to have participated in forced organ harvesting, as designated by the director of the department of health and human services. (b) The human organ to be transplanted was procured by a sale or donation originating in China or another country known to have participated in forced organ harvesting, as designated by the director of the department of health and human services. (2) As used in this section, "forced organ harvesting" means the removal of 1 or more organs from a living individual by means of coercion, abduction, deception, fraud, or abuse of power or a position of vulnerability.